California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
Every person who throws, deposits, or permits another in his employ to throw or deposit, any sawdust, slabs, or refuse lumber, in any place where it may be carried or fall into the waters of Humboldt Bay, without first having constructed piers, bulkheads, dams, or other contrivances, approved by the board of supervisors of Humboldt County, to prevent their escape into the channels of the bay, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

135.

(a) It is unlawful to cause or permit any petroleum, chemical, or other hazardous substance to be transferred between a vessel and a shore facility or another vessel by means of a pipeline or similar conduit unless the flow is continuously monitored by a properly installed, operated, and maintained mechanism that will warn of the imminent occurrence of an overflow of the substance being transferred so that the flow can be terminated in time to avert the overflow, and unless the vessel and the shore facility are each equipped with a properly installed, operated, and maintained mechanism that will warn whenever any person is no longer properly discharging his duties in connection with the transfer, is inattentive, or becomes disabled for any reason. Violation of this section is a misdemeanor. However, it shall be a defense to any prosecution for a violation of this section if the mechanism was properly installed and was at all times properly operated and maintained by the person responsible for the mechanism.

(b) A vessel subject to Part 35 of Title 46, or to Parts 155 and 156 of Title 33, of the Code of Federal Regulations, or a shore facility subject to Parts 154 and 156 of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations, satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a) if such vessel or shore facility formulates and establishes methods or operating procedures which are designed to satisfy such requirements and which are in accordance with applicable provisions of the Code of Federal Regulations. However, such methods and procedures shall require that the persons in charge of a transfer operation communicate with each other as frequently as is necessary to warn whenever any person is no longer properly discharging his duties in connection with the transfer, is inattentive, or becomes disabled for any reason.

(c) This section does not apply to any transfer of fuel to any self-propelled vessel of less than 65 feet in length at any facility equipped with dispensing nozzles of the automatic shut-off type that do not have catch-locks and meet all federal standards.

(d) This section does not apply to any on-shore receiving tankage if appropriate containment or diversionary structures, or both, or other equipment that is adequate to prevent the overflowed substance from reaching the waters of the state is provided.

(e) This section shall become operative with respect to a tank vessel that is subject to examination by the United States Coast Guard not later than the first occasion on or after January 1, 1980, that it is required to be drydocked or hauled out for such examination, as provided in Section 31.10-20 of Title 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations. This section shall become operative on July 1, 1980, with respect to any vessel that is not subject to any such examination; any tank barge, regardless of whether it is subject to such an examination; and any shore facility not made exempt by subdivision (d).

(f) As used in this section, “vessel” means every description of watercraft or other contrivance used, or capable of being used, as a means of transportation through or on water, including, but not limited to, a barge.

(g) As used in this section, “hazardous substance” means any such substance defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 1321 of Title 33 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Civil Offenses [151. - 153.]

151.

Except where permitted pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13200) of Division 7 of the Water Code, any person that intentionally or negligently causes or permits any oil to be deposited in the water of this state, including but not limited to navigable waters, shall be liable civilly in an amount not exceeding six thousand dollars ($6,000) and, in addition, shall be liable to any governmental agency charged with the responsibility for cleaning up or abating any such oil for all actual damages, in addition to the reasonable costs actually incurred in abating or cleaning up the oil deposit in such waters. The amount of the civil penalty which is assessed pursuant to this section shall be based upon the amount of discharge and the likelihood of permanent injury and shall be recoverable in a civil action by, and paid to, such governmental agency. If more than one such agency has responsibility for the waters in question, the agency which conducts the cleaning or abating activities shall be the agency authorized to proceed under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

153.

Any recovery or settlement of money damages, including, but not limited to, civil penalties, arising out of any civil action filed and maintained by the Attorney General in the enforcement of this chapter shall be deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund established pursuant to Section 12017 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 977, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. NAVIGATION [240. - 310.]



CHAPTER 1. Scope of Division [240. - 240.]

240.

The provisions of this Division, in so far as they are not in conflict with the admiralty and maritime jurisdiction and laws of the United States, apply to navigation on the navigable waters of the United States, as well as to navigation on the navigable waters of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Penalties [250. - 268.]

250.

When steam vessels meet each shall turn to the right, so as to pass without interference.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

251.

When a passenger is to be landed from a steam vessel by means of a small boat, he shall not be permitted to get into it until it is completely afloat and wholly disengaged from the steam vessel except by the painter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

No line used for the purpose of landing or receiving passengers may be attached in any way to the machinery of any steam vessel nor may the small boat used for such purpose be hauled in by means of such machinery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

During the landing and receiving of a passenger, and the going and returning of the small boat for the purpose, the engine shall be stopped, and may not be put in motion, except to give sufficient force to keep the steam vessel in a proper direction and safe position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

254.

There shall be kept in every small boat a good and suitable pair of oars. In the night-time a signal, by means of a horn or trumpet, shall be given to the steam vessel from the small boat, when having landed or received its passengers, it is ready to leave the shore.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

A steam vessel going in the same direction as a steam vessel ahead of it shall not approach or pass within the distance of ten yards; and the steam vessel ahead shall not be so navigated as unnecessarily to bring it within ten yards of the steam vessel following.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

256.

When any steam vessel is running in the night-time the master shall cause to be shown two conspicuous lights, one exposed near the bow and the other near the stern, the latter to be at least twenty feet above the deck.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

257.

Every person in charge of a steam vessel who violates any of the provisions of the preceding seven sections, incurs a penalty of two hundred and fifty dollars for each offense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

258.

The person in charge of any vessel at anchor in the night-time in any of the harbors or ports within the jurisdiction of this state, who fails to cause a conspicuous light to be shown in the rigging at least twenty feet above the deck, and another light to be shown from the taffrail, incurs a penalty of fifty dollars for every neglect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

259.

Neither the master nor the owner of any vesel can recover damages for injuries to the vessel or to himself resulting from a collision growing out of a failure to comply with the provisions of the preceding six sections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

Every raft of timber floated on the Sacramento or San Joaquin rivers at night which fails to show two red lights, one at each end, and at least ten feet above the upper logs or plank, incurs a penalty of fifty dollars for each neglect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

261.

Every steam vessel navigating any waters of this State and carrying passengers, shall be equipped with boats as follows:

(a) If of five hundred tons measurement, one first-class life-boat and one row-boat, twenty-five feet long by seven wide, each capable of carrying fifty persons; and at least one other good row-boat.

(b) If of two hundred and fifty and less than five hundred tons measurement, at least two ordinary row-boats.

(c) If of less than two hundred and fifty tons burden, at least one small row-boat.

The boats shall be so attached that they can be launched at any time for immediate use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

262.

Every master or owner, and each of them, of any vessel not provided with boats as required by this chapter, incurs a penalty of not exceeding two hundred and fifty dollars.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

263.

Every person in charge of a steam vessel navigating any of the waters of this State which is used for the conveyance of passengers, and every person in charge of the boiler or other apparatus for the generation of steam who, for the purpose of increasing speed or excelling any other vessel in speed, permits to be created an undue or an unsafe quantity of steam, incurs a penalty of five hundred dollars.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

264.

(a) A captain or other person having charge of any steam vessel used for the conveyance of passengers, or of its boilers and engines, who, from ignorance or gross neglect, or for the purpose of excelling any other boat in speed, creates, or allows to be created, such an undue quantity of steam as to burst or break the boiler, or any apparatus or machinery connected with the boiler, by which bursting or breaking human life is endangered, is guilty of a felony.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person found guilty of a felony violation of this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16
 months, two or three years, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 135.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

265.

The owners of every steam vessel are responsible for the good conduct of the master or other person in charge employed by them, and they are jointly and severally liable as sureties for any penalty established by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

266.

The penalties established by this chapter may be recovered by the district attorney of any county bordering on the water where the offense was committed or the penalty incurred, to whom notice is first given, and when recovered shall be equally divided between the county unapportioned elementary school fund and the indigent-sick fund of the county.

Any judgment pursuant to this section is a lien on the vessel against whose owners or master it is recovered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

268.

(a) Counties or cities may adopt restrictions concerning the navigation and operation of vessels and water skis, aquaplanes, or similar devices subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 660, and may grant permits to bona fide yacht clubs, water ski clubs, or civic organizations to conduct vessel or water ski races or other marine events over courses established, marked, and patrolled by authority of the United States Coast Guard, city harbormaster, or other officer having authority over the waters on which such race or other marine event is proposed to be conducted and on such days and between such hours as may be approved thereby. These provisions shall not apply to marine events authorized by United States Coast Guard permit.

(b) The provisions of this section shall apply to all waters which are in fact navigable regardless of whether they are declared navigable by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 345.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Losses [280. - 294.]



  ARTICLE 1. Navigation Rules [280. - 285.]

280.

The provisions of this article in addition to the provisions of other parts of this code which relate to navigation shall be observed by vessels when they meet.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

281.

Whenever any vessel, whether a steam vessel or sailing vessel, proceeding in one direction, meets another vessel, whether a steam vessel or sailing vessel, proceeding in the opposite direction, so that if both were to continue their respective courses they would pass so near as to involve the risk of a collision, each shall give right rudder, so as to pass on the port side of each other. This rule applies to all steam vessels and all sailing vessels whether on the port or starboard tack, and whether close-hauled or not, except where the circumstances of the case are such as to render a departure from the rule necessary in order to avoid immediate danger. It is subject to a due regard to the dangers of navigation, and, as regards sailing vessels on the starboard tack close-hauled, it is subject also to the keeping of such sailing vessels under command.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

282.

Sailing vessels, having the wind fair, shall give way to those on a wind. When both are going by the wind, the vessel on the starboard tack shall keep its wind, and the one on the port tack shall bear up strongly, so as to pass each other on the port side. When both vessels which have the wind large or abeam meet, they shall pass each other in the same way on the port side. To effect the two last-mentioned movements each shall give right rudder. Steam vessels shall be regarded as vessels navigating with a fair wind, and shall give way to sailing vessels on a wind of either tack.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

283.

A steam vessel navigating a narrow channel shall, whenever it is safe and practicable, keep to that side of the fairway or mid-channel which lies on its starboard side, and a steam vessel when passing another in such a channel, shall always leave the other upon the port side.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

284.

When steam vessels will inevitably or necessarily cross so near that by continuing their respective courses, there would be a risk of collision, each shall give right rudder, so as always to pass on the port side of the other.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

285.

The rules of this article do not apply to any case for which a different rule is provided by the regulations concerning lights upon steam vessels, or for the government of pilots of steam vessels approaching each other within the sound of the steam-whistle or other audible signal, prescribed by or under authority of the laws of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Liability [290. - 294.]

290.

If a collision is occasioned by failure to observe any rule of Article 1 of this chapter, the owner of the vessel by which the rule is infringed can not recover compensation for damages sustained by the vessel unless the circumstances of the case made a departure from the rule necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

291.

Damage to person or property arising from the failure of a vessel to observe any rule of Article 1 of this chapter, shall be deemed to have been occasioned by the wilful default of the person in charge of the deck at the time, unless the circumstances of the case made a departure from the rule necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

292.

Losses caused by collision are to be borne as follows:

(a) If either party was exclusively in fault he shall bear his own loss, and he shall compensate the other for any loss he has sustained.

(b) If neither was in fault, the loss shall be borne by him upon whom it falls.

(c) If both were in fault, the loss shall be equally divided, unless it appears that there was a great disparity in fault, in which case the loss shall be equitably apportioned.

(d) If it can not be ascertained where the fault lies, the loss shall be equally divided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

293.

Where damage arises out of, or is caused directly and proximately by, the acts of an owner or operator, without the interposition of any external or independent agency which could not reasonably be foreseen, any owner or operator of any vessel engaged in the commercial transportation, storage in a vessel, or transfer of petroleum, fuel oil, or hazardous substances shall be absolutely liable without regard to fault for any property damage incurred by the state or by any county, city or district, or by any person, within the state, and for any damage or injury to the natural resources of the state, including, but not limited to, marine and wildlife resources, caused by the discharge or leakage of petroleum, fuel oil, or hazardous substances from such vessel into or upon the navigable waters of the state.

As used in this section, “owner or operator” means any person owning or operating, or chartering by demise, such vessel; “person” means an individual, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, or partnership; and “navigable waters of the state” means all portions of the sea within the territorial jurisdiction of the state and all inland waters navigable in fact.

As used in this section, “hazardous substance” means any substance designated as such pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1321 of Title 33 of the United States Code.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the Miller Anti-Pollution Act of 1971.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

294.

(a) Any person responsible for natural gas, oil, drilling waste, or exploration, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (g), shall be absolutely liable without regard to fault for any damages incurred by any injured party which arise out of, or are caused by, the discharge or leaking of natural gas, oil, or drilling waste into or onto marine waters, or by any exploration in or upon marine waters, from any of the following sources:

(1) Any offshore well or undersea site at which there is exploration for or extraction or recovery of natural gas or oil.

(2) Any offshore facility, oil rig, or oil platform at which there is exploration for, or extraction, recovery, processing, or storage of, natural gas or oil.

(3) Any vessel offshore in which natural gas, oil, or drilling waste is transported, processed, or stored.

(4) Any pipeline located offshore in which natural gas, oil, or drilling waste is transported.

(b) A responsible person is not liable to an injured party under this section for any of the following:

(1) Damages, other than costs of removal incurred by the state or a local government, caused solely by any act of war, hostilities, civil war, or insurrection or by an unanticipated grave natural disaster or other act of God of an exceptional, inevitable, and irresistible character, which could not have been prevented or avoided by the exercise of due care or foresight.

(2) Damages caused solely by the negligence or intentional malfeasance of that injured party.

(3) Damages caused solely by the criminal act of a third party other than the defendant or an agent or employee of the defendant.

(4) Natural seepage not caused by a responsible party.

(5) Discharge or leaking of oil or natural gas from a private pleasure boat or vessel.

(6) Damages which arise out of, or are caused by, a discharge which is authorized by a state or federal permit.

(c) Upon motion and sufficient showing by a person deemed to be responsible under this section, the court shall join to the action any other person who may be responsible under this section.

(d) In determining whether a party is a responsible person under this section, the court shall consider the results of any chemical or other scientific tests conducted to determine whether oil or other substances produced, discharged, or controlled by the defendant matches the oil or other substance which caused the damage to the injured party. The defendant shall have the burden of producing the results of tests of samples of the substance which caused the injury and of substances for which the defendant is responsible, unless it is not possible to conduct the tests because of unavailability of samples to test or because the substance is not one for which reliable tests have been developed. At the request of any party, any other party shall provide samples of oil or other substances within its possession or control for testing.

(e) The court may award reasonable costs of the suit, attorneys’ fees, and the costs of any necessary expert witnesses, to any prevailing plaintiff. The court may award reasonable costs of the suit and attorneys’ fees to any prevailing defendant if the court finds that the plaintiff commenced or prosecuted the suit under this section in bad faith or solely for purposes of harassing the defendant.

(f) This section does not prohibit any person from bringing an action for damages caused by natural gas, oil, or drilling waste, or by exploration, under any other provision or principle of law, including, but not limited to, common law. However, damages shall not be awarded pursuant to this section to an injured party for any loss or injury for which the party is or has been awarded damages under any other provision or principle of law. Subdivision (b) does not create any defense not otherwise available regarding any action brought under any other provision or principle of law, including, but not limited to, common law.

(g) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Damages” are damages for any of the following:

(A) Injury or harm to real or personal property.

(B) Business loss, including loss of income.

(C) Costs of cleanup, removal, or treatment of natural gas, oil, or drilling waste.

(D) Cost of wildlife rehabilitation.

(E) When the injured party is the state, or a city, county, or district, in addition to any injury described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, damages include all of the following:

(i) Injury to natural resources or wildlife, and loss of use and enjoyment of public beaches and other public resources or facilities, within the jurisdiction of the state, city, county, or district.

(ii) Costs incurred to monitor the cleanup of the natural gas, oil, or drilling waste.

(iii) Loss of taxes.

(iv) Costs to assess damages to natural resources, wildlife, or habitat.

(2) “Injured party” means any person who suffers damages from natural gas, oil, or drilling waste, which is discharged or leaks into marine waters, or from offshore exploration. The state, or a city, county, or district, may be an injured party.

(3) “Natural gas” includes natural gas, liquified natural gas, and natural gas byproducts. “Natural gas” does not include natural gas carried in a vessel for use as fuel in that vessel.

(4) “Exploration” means boring and soil sampling.

(5) “Oil” and “drilling wastes” include, but are not limited to, petroleum, refined or processed petroleum, petroleum byproducts, oil sludge, oil refuse, oil mixed with wastes, and chemicals or other materials used in the exploration, recovery, or processing of oil. “Oil” does not include oil carried in a vessel for use as fuel in that vessel.

(6) “Person” means an individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity, or an association or other organization.

(7) “Responsible person” means any of the following:

(A) The owner or transporter of natural gas, oil, or drilling waste which causes an injury covered by this section.

(B) The owner, operator, or lessee of, or person who charters by demise, any offshore well, undersea site, facility, oil rig, oil platform, vessel, or pipeline which is the source of natural gas, oil, drilling waste, or is the source or location of exploration which causes an injury covered by this section.

“Responsible party” does not include the United States, the state, or any public agency.

(h) Liability under this section shall be joint and several. However, this section does not bar a cause of action that a responsible party has or would have, by reason of subrogation or otherwise, against any person.

(i) Section 3291 of the Civil Code applies to actions brought under this section.

(j) This section does not apply to claims for damages for personal injury or wrongful death, and does not limit the right of any person to bring an action for personal injury or wrongful death under any provision or theory of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Offenses [300. - 310.]

300.

A person who willfully and maliciously cuts, breaks, injures, sinks, or sets adrift a vessel of less than ten gross tons that is the property of another is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 19.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

301.

A person who willfully and maliciously cuts, breaks, or injures a vessel of ten gross tons and upwards that is the property of another is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 20.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

302.

A person who willfully and maliciously sinks or sets adrift a vessel of ten gross tons and upwards that is the property of another is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 21.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

A person who willfully and maliciously burns, injures, or destroys any part of, or the whole of, a pile or raft of wood, plank, boards, or other lumber, or cuts loose or sets adrift the raft or part of the raft, that is the property of another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 342.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

304.

A person in command or charge of a vessel, who, within this state, willfully wrecks, sinks, or otherwise injures or destroys it or any of its cargo, or willfully permits the same to be wrecked, sunk, or otherwise injured or destroyed, with intent to prejudice or defraud a person, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 22.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

305.

A person, other than one described in Section 304 who is guilty of any act specified in that section is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 23.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

A person who prepares, makes, or subscribes a false or fraudulent manifest, invoice, bill of lading, ship’s register, or protest, with intent to defraud another, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 24.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

(a) A person who moors a vessel to, or hangs on with a vessel to, a buoy or beacon, except a designated mooring buoy, is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) A person who willfully removes, damages, or destroys a buoy or beacon,
 placed by competent authority in any navigable waters of this state, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 67, Sec. 1.   (SB 1162)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

308.

A person who moors a vessel of any kind, to a buoy or beacon, except a designated mooring buoy, placed in the waters of the state by authority of the United States Coast Guard, or who in any manner hangs on to the same, with a vessel, or who willfully removes, damages, or destroys any such buoy or beacon, or any part of the buoy or beacon, or who cuts down, removes, damages, or destroys a beacon erected on land in this state by that authority, is, for every offense, guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 26.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

309.

A person found guilty of a misdemeanor violation as
 provided in this chapter shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 27.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

310.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person found guilty of a felony violation as provided in this chapter shall be subject to a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, two or three years, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 136.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. VESSELS [399. - 786.]



CHAPTER 1. Vessels Generally [399. - 449.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [399. - 406.]

399.

The provisions of this Division shall not be construed to apply to the extent to which they are not within the legislative power of this state, except in so far as they may be permitted to apply under the provisions of the Constitution of the United States or the acts of Congress.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

400.

“Appurtenances” include all things belonging to the owners, which are on board a vessel, and which are connected with its proper use and the objects of the voyage and adventure in which it is engaged.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

Vessels are engaged in foreign or domestic navigation, or in the fisheries. Vessels are engaged in foreign navigation when passing to or from a foreign country; and in domestic navigation, when passing from place to place within the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

A vessel in a port of the country in which it is registered is called a domestic vessel, in another port it is called a foreign vessel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

If a vessel belongs to several persons, not partners, and they differ as to its use or repair, the controversy may be determined by any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

If the owner of a vessel commits its possession and navigation to another, that other, and not the owner, is responsible for its repairs and supplies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

The registry, enrollment, and license of vessels are regulated by acts of Congress.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

Any and all rights and obligations created pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 450) of this division are subordinate to any superseding federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1341.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Vessel Repair [410. - 418.]

410.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Customer” means any person who requests a repairperson to do work on a vessel which is in the possession of that person.

(b) “Repairperson” means any person engaged in the business of repairing vessels.

(c) “Vessel” means any vessel which is subject to registration with the Department of Motor Vehicles and which is manufactured or used for noncommercial purposes or is leased, rented, or chartered to another for noncommercial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

This article applies only to work done on a vessel with an estimated cost of one hundred dollars ($100) or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

Notwithstanding Section 502, a repairperson has no lien on a vessel under this article for compensation for services rendered to the vessel, unless the repairperson has complied with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

No repairperson shall commence work for compensation without specific authorization from the customer or his or her agent in accordance with all of the following requirements:

(a) The repairperson shall give to the customer either of the following:

(1) A written estimated price for labor and parts for a specific job.

(2) A written estimate of the maximum cost for a specific job which does not differentiate between labor and parts, but which shall not be exceeded by the actual cost of the job, including labor and parts.

No work shall be done or parts supplied in excess of, or different from, the original written estimate without the separate oral or written consent of the customer. If the consent is oral, the repairperson shall make a notation on the work order and on the invoice of the date, time, name of person authorizing the additional work or change in work, and the telephone number called, if any, together with a specification of the additional parts and labor and the total additional cost.

(b) If it is necessary to disassemble a vessel or its component in order to prepare a written estimated price for required work, the repairperson shall first give the customer a written estimated price for the disassembly and reassembly. The estimate shall also include the cost of parts and necessary labor to replace items such as gaskets, seals, and O rings that are normally destroyed by disassembling the component. If the disassembling might prevent the restoration of the component to its former condition, the repairperson shall write that information on the work order containing the estimate before the work order is signed by the customer.

The repairperson shall inform the customer orally, and conspicuously in writing on the work order, of the maximum time it will take the repairperson to reassemble the vessel or its component if the customer elects not to proceed with the work. The repairperson shall not charge the customer for more time than the specified maximum time if the customer elects not to proceed with the work.

After the disassembling has been performed, the repairperson shall prepare a written estimated price for labor and parts necessary for the requested work. Before performing the requested work, the repairperson shall obtain the customer’s authorization to either perform the work or to reassemble the vessel or its components.

(c) When the customer is unable to deliver the vessel to the repairperson during business hours, and the customer has requested the repairperson to take possession of the vessel for the purpose of performing work on the vessel or estimating the cost of the work, the repairperson shall not undertake work on the vessel for compensation unless the repairperson has done all of the following:

(1) The repairperson has prepared a work order stating the written estimated price for labor and parts necessary to perform the work.

(2) By telephone or otherwise, the customer has been given all of the information on the work order, and the customer has approved the work order.

(3) The customer has given oral or written authorization to the repairperson to make the repairs pursuant to the work order.

If the authorization is oral, the repairperson shall make, on both the work order and the invoice, a notation of the name of the customer, the date, the time, and the telephone number called, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

414.

Any repairperson who gives an original estimate in good faith, shall not be obligated to complete a job within the quoted or written estimated price if additional, unforeseen work is necessary to complete the job and the customer refuses to consent to payment for the cost of that additional work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

415.

All work done by a repairperson, including all warranty work, shall be recorded on an invoice and shall describe all work done and parts supplied.

Work and parts shall be listed separately on the invoice, which shall also state separately the subtotal prices for work and for parts, not including sales tax, and shall state separately the sales tax, if any, applicable to each.
